Colorado, session 2026A, HB1388.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-103-1104, amend
(2)(b)(III); and add (2)(b)(IV) and (2)(b)(V) as follows:
24-103-1104. State procurement equity program - established -
goal - preliminary implementation maximization of contracting
opportunities - expansion of historically underutilized business registry
- real-time solicitation assistance help desk - bond assistance program
- cash fund - report - repeal.
(2) As implementation of the program, the department shall:
(b) (III) (A) On July 1, 2022, the state treasurer shall transfer two
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

million dollars from the general fund to the bond assistance program cash
fund.
(B) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER THE
UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED BALANCE OF THE BOND ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM CASH FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(IV) THE DEPARTMENT MUST USE ANY ENCUMBERED BALANCE THAT
REMAINS IN THE BOND ASSISTANCE CASH FUND AFTER THE TRANSFER UNDER
SUBSECTION (2)(b)(III)(B) OF THIS SECTION ONLY TO FULFILL THE
OBLIGATIONS ENCUMBERING THE BALANCE OF THE FUND.
(V) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 1,
2027.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1388

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1388